Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle A. Shares.

§79-4-6.01.
Authorized shares.

The articles of incorporation must set forth any classes of shares and series of shares within a class, and the number of shares of each class and series, that the corporation is authorized to issue. If more than one (1) class or series of shares is authorized, the articles of incorporation must prescribe a distinguishing designation for each class or series and must describe, prior to the issuance of shares of a class or series, the terms, including the preferences, rights, and limitations of that class or series. Except to the extent varied as permitted by this section, all shares of a class or series must have terms, including preferences, rights and limitations that are identical with those of other shares of the same class or series.

The articles of incorporation must authorize:

One or more classes or series of shares that together have unlimited voting rights, and

One or more classes or series of shares (which may be the same class or classes as those with voting rights) that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution.

Entitle the holders to distributions calculated in any manner, including dividends that may be cumulative, noncumulative or partially cumulative; or

Have preference over any other class or series of shares with respect to distributions, including distributions upon the dissolution of the corporation.

The articles of incorporation may authorize one or more classes or series of shares that:

Have special, conditional or limited voting rights, or no right to vote, except to the extent otherwise provided by Section 79-4-1.01 et seq.;

Are redeemable or convertible as specified in the articles of incorporation (i) at the option of the corporation, the shareholder or another person or upon the occurrence of a specified event; (ii) for cash, indebtedness, securities or other property; and (iii) at prices and in amounts specified or determined in accordance with a formula;

Terms of shares may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the articles of incorporation in accordance with Section 79-4-1.20(k).

Any of the terms of shares may vary among holders of the same class or series so long as such variations are expressly set forth in the articles of incorporation.

The description of the preferences, rights and limitations of classes or series of shares in subsection (c) is not exhaustive.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.01; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

The 2001 amendment, in the second sentence of (a), inserted “terms, including the” preceding “preferences,” inserted “rights, and” preceding “limitations,” and deleted “and relative rights” following “limitations”; in the third sentence of (a), inserted “terms, including” preceding “preferences,” inserted “rights and” preceding “limitations,” deleted “and relative rights” following “limitations,” and inserted “this section or” preceding “Section 79-4-6.02”; and added (c)(5).

The 2004 amendment rewrote the section.

Applicability of this section to mandatory provisions of articles of incorporation, see § 79-4-2.02.

Authority of board of directors to determine preferences, limitations and relative rights of classes of shares, see § 79-4-6.02.

Fractional shares, see § 79-4-6.04.

Share dividends, see § 79-4-6.23.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.

Voluntary dissolution of corporation after issuance of shares, see § 79-4-14.02.

Incorporators who, following the issuance of a certificate of incorporation but prior to the payment into the treasury of the corporation of the required $1,000 as consideration for the issuance of shares, executed, as officers of the corporation, its note for $25,000, were not individually on the corporation’s note. In re Estate of Hardin, 218 So. 2d 889, 1969 Miss. LEXIS 1634 (Miss. 1969).

A deed to a corporation after its organization meeting is valid notwithstanding at the time the amount of capital stock required by this section [Code 1942, § 5311] had not been paid up. Allen v. Thompson, 248 Miss. 544, 158 So. 2d 503, 1963 Miss. LEXIS 406 (Miss. 1963).

Construction and application of provisions of articles, bylaws, statutes, or agreements restricting alienation or transfer of corporate stock.
2 A.L.R.2d 745.

Statutory requirements respecting issuance of corporate stock as applicable to foreign corporations.
8 A.L.R.2d 1185.

Delay of stockholders in exercising their right to convert their stock into other class of stock or corporate obligations.
10 A.L.R.2d 587.

Enforcement of stock subscription after suit on note of subscriber is barred by statute of limitations.
11 A.L.R.2d 1380.

Validity of stock option plan under which selected personnel of corporation may acquire stock interest therein.
34 A.L.R.2d 852.

Validity of restrictions on alienation of corporate stock.
61 A.L.R.2d 1318.

Right or duty of corporation to refuse to transfer stock on presentation of properly indorsed certificate, because of conflicting rights or claims of one other than transferee.
75 A.L.R.2d 746.

Construction and effect of constitutional or statutory provisions precluding issuance of corporate stock in consideration of promissory notes.
78 A.L.R.2d 834.

Failure to issue stock as factor in disregard of corporate entity.
8 A.L.R.3d 1122.

Corporation’s delivery of stock certificate to stockholder as prerequisite of its issuance to him.
16 A.L.R.3d 1015.

Change in stock or corporate structure, or split or substitution of stock of corporation, as affecting bequest of stock.
46 A.L.R.3d 7.

Corporation: validity of charter provision for non-voting common stock.
52 A.L.R.3d 1131.

Validity and construction of provision restricting transfer of corporate stock, which conditions transfer upon consent of one other than shareholder, officer, or director of corporation.
53 A.L.R.3d 1272.

Valuation of corporate stock for purposes of state gift, inheritance or estate tax, as affected by predetermined price in buy-out or first option agreement among stockholders or with corporation.
58 A.L.R.3d 1104.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 355 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:624 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 61 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 254 et seq.

Holmes, The revised Model Business Corporation Act and corporate law reform in Mississippi.
57 Miss. L. J. 271, August, 1987.

§79-4-6.02.
Terms of class or series determined by board of directors.

If the articles of incorporation so provide, the board of directors is authorized without shareholder approval, to:

Classify any unissued shares into one or more classes or into one or more series within a class;

Reclassify any unissued shares of any class into one or more classes or into one or more series within one or more classes; or

Reclassify any unissued shares of any series of any class into one or more classes or into one or more series within a class.

If the board of directors acts pursuant to subsection (a), it must determine the terms, including the preferences, rights and limitations, to the same extent permitted under Section 79-4-6.01 of:

Any class of shares before the issuance of any shares of that class, or

Any series within a class before the issuance of any shares of that series.

Before issuing any shares of a class or series created under this section, the corporation must deliver to the Secretary of State for filing articles of amendment setting forth the terms determined under subsection (a).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.02; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

The 2001 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2004 amendment rewrote the section.

Restrictions on board’s authority to determine preferences, limitations and relative rights of classes of shares, see § 79-4-6.01.

Validity of cancellation of accrued dividends on preferred corporate stock. 8 A.L.R.2d 893.

Overpayments of dividends on preferred stock as deductible in payment of dividends for later years. 10 A.L.R.2d 241.

Preferred stockholder’s rights, upon liquidation or dissolution, to dividends. 25 A.L.R.2d 788.

Rights of preferred stockholders as to past or accumulated dividends in going concern. 27 A.L.R.2d 1073.

Validity and construction of provision restricting transfer of corporate stock, which conditions transfer upon consent of one other than shareholder, officer, or director of corporation.
53 A.L.R.3d 1272.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 361, 363, 404.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1079 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:654 et seq., 74:685 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 261, 288 et seq.

§79-4-6.03.
Issued and outstanding shares.

A corporation may issue the number of shares of each class or series authorized by the articles of incorporation. Shares that are issued are outstanding shares until they are reacquired, redeemed, converted or cancelled.

The reacquisition, redemption or conversion of outstanding shares is subject to the limitations of subsection (c) of this section and to Section 79-4-6.40.

At all times that shares of the corporation are outstanding, one or more shares that together have unlimited voting rights and one or more shares that together are entitled to receive the net assets of the corporation upon dissolution must be outstanding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.03, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.

Validity and construction of provision restricting transfer of corporate stock, which conditions transfer upon consent of one other than shareholder, officer, or director of corporation.
53 A.L.R.3d 1272.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 187, 403-437, 617.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:653-74:690.

18 C.J.S., Corporations, §§ 261-276.

§79-4-6.04.
Fractional shares.

A corporation may:

Issue fractions of a share or pay in money the value of fractions of a share;

Arrange for disposition of fractional shares by the shareholders;

Issue scrip in registered or bearer form entitling the holder to receive a full share upon surrendering enough scrip to equal a full share.

Each certificate representing scrip must be conspicuously labeled “scrip” and must contain the information required by Section 79-4-6.25(b).

The holder of a fractional share is entitled to exercise the rights of a shareholder, including the right to vote, to receive dividends, and to participate in the assets of the corporation upon liquidation. The holder of scrip is not entitled to any of these rights unless the scrip provides for them.

The board of directors may authorize the issuance of scrip subject to any condition considered desirable, including:

That the scrip will become void if not exchanged for full shares before a specified date; and

That the shares for which the scrip is exchangeable may be sold and the proceeds paid to the scripholders.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.04, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Shareholder’s right to appraisal, see § 79-4-13.02.